Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
In an arson case, counsel was ineffective for failing to properly investigate the petitioner's mental history for a possible insanity defense before trial where counsel was aware of a bipolar diagnosis, did not obtain medical records for review, and did not consult with a mental health professional nor obtain an opinion about the petitioner's mental state at the time of the offense. Counsel's failure to properly investigate the matter and make an insanity plea appeared to have deprived the petitioner of the only true defense available to him, and it had a reasonable likelihood of success. Keats v. State, 2005 WY 81, 115 P.3d 1110,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2005).

Counsel not ineffective in handling of expert testimony. —

In defendant's second degree murder case, counsel was not ineffective for failing to adequately investigate the victim's actual cause of death by presenting expert testimony that challenged the autopsy results where the unrefuted evidence presented was that defense counsel did investigate and check into the basis for the coroner's opinions as to the cause of death of the victim. Additionally, counsel made knowing and considered tactical trial decisions relative to the handling of the cause of death issue in connection with the theory of the defense presented to the jury at trial. Lopez v. State, 2004 WY 28, 86 P.3d 851,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2004).

Ineffective assistance for allowing defendant to absent himself.
—

Defendant failed to show that his defense counsel was ineffective in allowing defendant to absent himself from the peremptory challenge portion of jury selection where, to the contrary, the record reflected that counsel systematically included the defendant in the jury evaluation and selection process. Gleason v. State, 2002 WY 161, 57 P.3d 332,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2002).

Ineffective assistance based upon failure to object. —

In defendant's sexual assault case, counsel was ineffective for failing to make appropriate objections, because garnering trust for one's client rarely began by allowing the jury to hear the detailed testimony from two murder trials in which that client was convicted; neither was the client's veracity enhanced by allowing law enforcement officers to testify that they believed he was guilty.
Proffit v. State, 2008 WY 114, 193 P.3d 228,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2008).

In defendant's sexual assault case, counsel was ineffective for failing demand notice of or object to prior acts of misconduct because the state produced uncharged misconduct evidence at trial, without defense counsel having filed a pretrial demand for notice of such evidence, without defense counsel objecting contemporaneously with the introduction of the evidence, and without evidence being scrutinized by district court prior to its admission.
Proffit v. State, 2008 WY 114, 193 P.3d 228,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2008).

Defendant received ineffective assistance of counsel in a drug case because counsel failed to object to a prosecutor's questions that prompted testimony from law enforcement amounting to an opinion that defendant was guilty of crimes charged and the prosecutor's questions and comments vouching for the credibility of the State's witnesses, and he failed to request that audio tapes be played in their entirety; moreover, counsel failed to demand notice of prior bad acts evidence, request a pre-trial hearing to determine admissibility, enter an objection to the testimony, or request an instruction telling the jury to disregard it. There was a reasonable probability that, but for counsel's actions, the result of the trial would have been different. Fennell v. State, 2015 WY 67, 350 P.3d 710,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2015).

Counsel may have been ineffective for failure to pursue discovery
and to protect defendant's right to testify. —

Trial court abused its discretion in ignoring remand directive that it determine if defense counsel had been ineffective in failing to follow-up on defendant's request to provide documents that might support loan/purchase defenses and in failing to ask for continuance on the record but instead waiving defendant's right to testify at trial after health problems made it doubtful that defendant could testify effectively. Barker v. State, 2005 WY 20, 106 P.3d 297,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2005).

Ineffective assistance for egregious errors. —

Counsel's failure to move to suppress defendant's statements and diary resulting from an illegal search and seizure, together with the failure to object to these at trial, were so egregious that these errors, without more, constituted ineffective assistance of counsel and demanded reversal of her arson conviction. Dickeson v. State, 843 P.2d 606,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1992).

Assistance not ineffective for tactical decision. —

Defendant's counsel was not ineffective under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10 for not raising the defense of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency where nothing in the record indicated other than that defendant consented to the trial strategy of admitting to shooting victims to avoid the death penalty or to reduce culpability for the sentencing phase. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Counsel were not ineffective for conceding defendant's guilt in a murder case where it was apparent from the record that counsel sought to avoid a first-degree murder conviction by admitting that defendant stabbed and killed the victim, undermining the requisite mental state for first-degree murder due to his intoxication, and asking the jury for a verdict of manslaughter based on the circumstances surrounding the stabbing. Siler v. State, 2005 WY 73, 115 P.3d 14,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2005).

Ineffectiveness for failing to request presentence investigation
report. —

In a sexual assault case, defendant did not show prejudice for alleged ineffectiveness of counsel for failing to request a presentencing investigation report or to object to the harshness of imposition of two life sentences either at sentencing or afterwards because, under the habitual criminal statute, the trial court had no choice but to impose two life sentences. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Waiver of right to defend by counsel. —

The right or privilege to defend by counsel, as guaranteed by this section, may be waived or renounced, and it is not denied by a mere failure to assign counsel, there being no invasion of it disclosed unless it appears by the record that a request for assignment of counsel was denied by the court. James v. State, 27 Wyo. 378, 196 P. 1045,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1921).

Use of nonlawyer judge. —

The performance of an accused's lawyer is not per se impaired when a nonlawyer judge presides over the accused's misdemeanor trial. Amrein v. State, 836 P.2d 862,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1992).

Trial court's intrusion into attorney-client relationship.
—

Defendant's bald assertion that a trial court interfered with the attorney-client relationship was insufficient in a case where the trial court conducted a hearing prior to closing argument relating to defense counsel's effectiveness; defendant asserted only that the implications of the interference could have reverberated through defense counsel's closing, his argument at sentencing, or during any advice he provided defendant after the hearing.
Fernandez v. State, 2007 WY 198, 172 P.3d 730,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 2007).

Prosecution's intrusion into attorney-client relationship.
—

The prosecution's intrusion into the attorney-client relationship of the defendant and his defense counsel did not substantially prejudice the defendant's defense where a deputy sheriff had divulged to the prosecutor the substance of some of the conversations between defense counsel and the defendant that he had overheard during trial preparation sessions at which he was present for security reasons. Haworth v. State, 840 P.2d 912,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1992), cert. denied, 508 U.S. 930, 113 S. Ct. 2395, 124 L. Ed. 2d 296, 1993 U.S. LEXIS 3540 (U.S. 1993).

On appeal the court rejected defendant's claim that his right to effectively defend and participate in his defense was denied where a deputy sat during trial in a chair along a wall, halfway between defendant's table and the prosecution's table, as far as practicable from defendant; there was no evidence that the deputy heard anything said at defendant's table, the deputy had been instructed never to repeat anything he heard at defendant's table, there was no allegation of prejudice from the use of any information obtained by the deputy from overhearing conversation at defendant's table, and defendant did not state what conversation he would have had if the deputy had not been seated in nearby. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

Prosecutorial misconduct not prejudicial due to court instructions.
—

In an arson case, defendant was not denied his right to a fair trial based on prosecutorial misconduct where the prosecutor made a valid inquiry into defendant's ability to recall with accuracy the events that occurred before, during and after the time of the fire. The prosecutor made an improper comment regarding defendant “skipping out on a bill,” the district court sustained an objection, and the jury was given both oral and written instructions to disregard any testimony for which an objection was sustained. In addition, the existence of a check was as well known to defendant, as it was to the prosecution, so the evidence was not withheld. Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2004).

Right to fair trial not violated by prosecutor's remarks. —

In a vehicular homicide case, defendant's right to a fair trial was not violated by prosecutor's remarks during opening and closing argument regarding the effect that the victim's death would have on family and friends where the evidence of defendant's guilt was overwhelming, the district court gave a jury instruction immediately prior to the prosecutor's opening statement, and the district court also specifically instructed the jury to disregard the prosecutor's remarks immediately after they occurred. Whitney v. State, 2004 WY 118, 99 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1001, 125 S. Ct. 1931, 161 L. Ed. 2d 775, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3570 (U.S. 2005).

Court rejected defendant's claim that the prosecutor violated his right to a fair trial during the closing argument by misstating key facts to the jury, improperly personalizing her argument, improperly commenting on or vouching for the credibility of trial witnesses, and implying that defendant's testimony was not credible simply because he had been charged with crimes. Defendant bore the burden of establishing prosecutorial misconduct and did not object to the alleged incidents of misconduct at trial, and the prosecutor's remarks were legitimate argument as to what particular inferences the jury should and should not make based on the evidence produced at trial, and what evidence and other factors the jury should weigh in evaluating the credibility of the witnesses. Davis v. State, 2005 WY 93, 117 P.3d 454,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2005).

Defendant's right to a fair trial was not violated by a prosecutor's remarks in an arson case because, even though the remarks during closing argument improperly failed to recognize the limited effect of a statement made by a neighbor to a fire inspector, there was other evidence admitted to show the condition of an apartment before the fire. There was also no prosecutorial misconduct relating to the questioning of the inspector about the reasons for setting a fire since defense counsel opened the door, and the prosecutor did not misstate the evidence, violate rules pertaining to courtroom professionalism, or improperly comment on witness credibility.
Szymanski v. State, 2007 WY 139, 166 P.3d 879,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2007), cert. denied, 552 U.S. 1153, 128 S. Ct. 1095, 169 L. Ed. 2d 830, 2008 U.S. LEXIS 762 (U.S. 2008).

Right to a fair and impartial trial not violated by judicial
comments. —

Defendant's right to a fair and impartial trial was not violated by comments made by a judge during a burglary trial relating to the possible excusing of a doctor as a juror and the fact that someone would be in trouble if the trial ran longer than three days; the comments were not calculated to belittle or disparage defense counsel or create the impression that the defense had no merit.
Fernandez v. State, 2007 WY 198, 172 P.3d 730,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 2007).

Statement made during police interrogation held inadmissible.
—

Where the suspect has requested and been denied an opportunity to consult with his lawyer, and the police have not effectively warned him of his absolute constitutional right to remain silent, no statement elicited by the police during the interrogation may be used against him at a criminal trial. Kennedy v. State, 422 P.2d 88,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1967), commented on in III Land & Water L. Rev. 613 (1968).

Prosecution entitled to notes of social worker hired by defendant.
—

Where defendant asserted an affirmative defense of diminished capacity and battered woman syndrome and hired a licensed social worker to evaluate her, trial court's order requiring production of social worker's notes did not intrude on defendant's attorney-client privilege, and her constitutional right to assistance of counsel was not violated. Trusky v. State, 7 P.3d 5,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2000).

Shackling of defendant during trial. —

In a sexual assault case, a court's abuse of discretion in allowing the shackling of defendant during trial was harmless error and did not deny defendant his right to a fair trial where defendant was seated before the jury was brought in, and the shackles could not be seen once the jury was seated. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Right of allocution not violated. —

In the context of Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32(c) and the constitutional right of allocution, a defendant's right of allocution is not violated when he or she has been given an adequate opportunity under the circumstances to speak on his or her own behalf.
Sandoval v. State, 2009 WY 121, 217 P.3d 393,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2009).

Defendant was not denied the right of allocution during a sentencing hearing for second-degree murder because defendant was able to present a statement on defendant's own behalf to the trial court; defendant did not describe on appeal the additional information defendant would have presented to the trial court had defendant been asked in a different manner.
Sandoval v. State, 2009 WY 121, 217 P.3d 393,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2009).

Defendant not required to speak to court. —

A defendant's choice to exercise his right to allocution is entirely voluntary; he can speak to the court, but he is not required to do so; a defendant's statements may be admissible against him in further proceedings, provided they are voluntary. Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. July 8, 1992), cert. denied, 506 U.S. 1022, 113 S. Ct. 661, 121 L. Ed. 2d 586, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 7732 (U.S. 1992).

Defendant's waiver of right to testify

was valid and constitutionally sufficient. His trial counsel did not restrict him from testifying, thus he did not meet his initial burden of establishing that he was not permitted to testify. Consequently, he could not show that his testimony would have been to establish that his trial counsel's performance was deficient. Herdt v. State, 891 P.2d 793,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1995).

Defendant should have timely information of accusation.

State v. Kusel, 29 Wyo. 287, 213 P. 367,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1923).

Fatal variance in information. —

Where defendant who lived in California sold drugs to Wyoming residents in California, to be sold in Wyoming, and was convicted of conspiracy with intent to deliver methamphetamine, but the information alleged that “the conspiratorial agreement occurred in Wyoming or defendant conspired to commit an act beyond the State of Wyoming,” the failure to include an element of the offense charged in the information, that a conspiracy occurred that was intended to have had an effect in Wyoming, was a fatal variance, which a detailed affidavit could not cure. Estrada-Sanchez v. State, 2003 WY 45, 66 P.3d 703,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2003).

Amendment of information. —

An information may not be amended if it prejudices the defendant or charges a different offense. The prohibition against charging additional or different offenses implicates the defendant's right to know the charges against him and to prepare a defense to those charges, which is protected by U.S. Const. amend. VI, and this provision. Meek v. State, 2002 WY 1, 37 P.3d 1279,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 1

6 (Wyo. Feb. 5, 2002).

Lack of specific date in information not necessary where not
required by statute. —

Where the statutory definition of the offense does not require a specific date, such a date need not be given in the information; alleging a general time period is sufficient to give notice to a defendant and allow him to prepare an alibi defense. Stewart v. State, 724 P.2d 439,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 605

(Wyo. 1986).

Omission of victims' names error. —

Omission of the victims' names from the criminal complaint, the criminal warrant, and the information rendered the documents fatally defective, deprived the lower courts of jurisdiction and warranted reversal of conviction of violation of §

14-3-104

.Walker v. State, 847 P.2d 542,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. Mar. 16, 1993).

Uniform traffic citations sufficiently inform of nature of
offense. —

The purpose behind uniform traffic citations is to provide for the speedy and effective disposition of traffic offenses. Within such an informal procedure it is not necessary that the charge be set forth with the same technical precision and formality as required in an information or verified complaint. All that is required is that the accused be informed of the nature of the offense with which he is charged. Such a requirement can be fulfilled by stating the commonly used name of the offense and the statute or ordinance violated. This is sufficient even if it means the accused may be required to inquire of the arresting officer or someone else exactly what the offense includes.
Swisse v. Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

The notation “careless driving” accompanied by reference to the ordinance number informs defendant of the nature of the offense charged with all the specificity needed.
Swisse v. Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

Sufficiency of indictment. —

An indictment to be legally sufficient must fairly indicate the crime charged, must state the essential elements of the alleged crime, must be sufficiently definite so that the defendant can prepare his defense and must grant protection from further prosecution for the same offense. Gonzales v. State, 551 P.2d 929,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1976).

In a criminal indictment, it is only necessary to allege sufficiently to allow the accused to understand the charge and prepare his defense. Gonzales v. State, 551 P.2d 929,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1976).

Where a defendant is not misled to his prejudice, an indictment is not invalid because it does not conform exactly to the language of the statute. However, any variations from the statutory language must be in words carrying the same import as the statute. Gonzales v. State, 551 P.2d 929,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1976).

It was clear that defendant had adequate notice of the charge for which he was convicted, one count of larceny by bailee in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-402(b) (2001), in comparing the charging documents with the trial court's oral ruling. The court did not see the amount of evidence presented as creating a problem with defendant's right to notice of the charges against him; it simply amounted to a failure of proof on the State's part; moreover, there was no prejudice to defendant as the trial court specifically rejected the State's contentions as to the other items.
Barker v. State, 2006 WY 104, 141 P.3d 106,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2006).

Evidence, including deputy's testimony that defendant kicked him and testimony of defendant's roommate that defendant thrashed about and knocked a group down the stairs, was sufficient to convict defendant of felony interference with a peace officer in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b). Regardless of which theory was asserted, defendant was adequately advised of the charge against him under U.S. Const. amend. VI and Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10.
Hulsy v. State, 2009 WY 81, 209 P.3d 901,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 2009).

Penal statute held void for uncertainty. —

Act declaring 8 hours to constitute a lawful day's work on public works and penalty for violation thereof was void as a penal statute in view of this section because of indefiniteness and uncertainty of its penal provisions. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

Statute validating indictments notwithstanding minor defects.
—

Statute providing that indictments or informations shall not be deemed invalid by reason of certain omissions or defects as, for instance, stating the time imperfectly, when construed with other sections concerning procedure for questioning materiality of defects, does not violate this section of the constitution. White v. State, 23 Wyo. 130, 147 P. 171,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1915), reh'g denied, 23 Wyo. 130, 148 P. 342,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1915), writ of error dismissed, 241 U.S. 655, 36 S. Ct. 726, 60 L. Ed. 1224, 1916 U.S. LEXIS 1393 (U.S. 1916).

Offenses included in charge. —

In the charge of an intent to commit murder in the first degree, there is necessarily included a charge of intent to commit murder in the second degree, and voluntary manslaughter. Brantley v. State, 9 Wyo. 102, 61 P. 139,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1900).

Information charging murder with malice will support conviction on proof showing murder during attempted robbery, notwithstanding this section. Harris v. State, 34 Wyo. 175, 242 P. 411,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1926).

District court erred in instructing the jury that assault was a lesser included offense of aggravated assault and battery where assault did not require a threat to use a drawn deadly weapon, and aggravated assault and battery did not require an attempt to cause bodily injury to another. Cecil v. State, 2015 WY 158, 364 P.3d 1086,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2015).

Two victims identified in single count of information. —

Information was sufficient, where defendant failed to show prejudice from state's identification of two victims in one count. Taylor v. State, 7 P.3d 15,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2000).

Information may not be amended if it prejudices defendant or charges different offense.

The prohibition against charging additional or different offenses implicates the defendant's right to know the charges against him and to prepare a defense to those charges, which is protected by this section and the sixth amendment to the federal constitution.McInturff v. State, 808 P.2d 190,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1991).

Victim's records not released unless constitutionally material.
—

Where a defendant was charged with taking indecent liberties with a minor, the nondisclosure to defense counsel of school records concerning the child did not deny the defendant his constitutional rights to a fair trial and to confront witnesses and to compulsory process, nor did the trial court err in conducting an in-camera review of the records and applying a standard of constitutional materiality in determining which records, if any, were to be released to defendant's counsel. Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1990).

Violation of confrontation right by prohibiting cross-examination.
—

In defendant's sexual assault case, a court violated defendant's confrontation rights by prohibiting defendant from cross-examining the victim where the victim was the only witness to the alleged crime, there was no physical evidence tying defendant to the alleged assault nor were there any eyewitnesses, the victim did not report the allegations until three months after the fact when he was brought in for questioning about his own sexual improprieties with another boy. Had defense counsel been allowed to explore the issue with the victim during cross-examination, the jury reasonably might have inferred that the victim was fearful about what would happen to him as a result of his own acts and concocted the allegations against defendant to shift the focus of the police inquiry away from him. Hannon v. State, 2004 WY 8, 84 P.3d 320,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2004).

Although defendant contended that a district court improperly limited defendant's cross-examination of a witness by denying defendant the opportunity to explore potential evidence of bias and a possible ulterior motive for the testimony of the witness, any error was harmless beyond a reasonable doubt given the relative unimportance of the testimony of the witness and the strength of the case against defendant. Broussard v. State, 2017 WY 73, 396 P.3d 1016,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2017).

No violation of confrontation right by prohibiting cross-examination. —

In a felony child abuse case, defendant's confrontation rights were not violated because defendant was not prevented from having an opportunity to conduct an effective cross-examination of an alleged victim relating to the victim's alleged molestation of his sister; the trial court failed to make a final ruling as to whether defendant could offer the evidence, and defense counsel did not broach the subject on cross-examination. Moreover, defendant was permitted to testify regarding the alleged molestation, which he did at length. Swan v. State, 2014 WY 38, 320 P.3d 235,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2014).

Although defendant contended that a district court improperly limited defendant's cross-examination of a witness, defendant failed to establish that defendant's cross-examination of the witness was improperly limited as a sanction for defendant's failure to comply with a pretrial disclosure order because the district court did not make any reference to the sanction in ruling on defendant's objection and the district court specifically authorized additional inquiry about any memory issues that the witness may have had. Broussard v. State, 2017 WY 73, 396 P.3d 1016,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2017).

Allowing testimony of three-year-old child did not deny accused right of confrontation.

In Interest of CB, 749 P.2d 267,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1988).

Prosecution's failure to advise counsel of hypnotic sessions involving witness was not unconstitutional,

where prosecutor did not know of sessions until day before trial and defense counsel had had time to review the tapes. Haselhuhn v. State, 727 P.2d 280,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 633

(Wyo. 1986), cert. denied, 479 U.S. 1098, 107 S. Ct. 1321, 94 L. Ed. 2d 174, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 849 (U.S. 1987).

Not all tendered exhibits admissible. —

The constitutional right to a defense does not guarantee the opportunity to a criminal defendant to have every tendered exhibit introduced into evidence. Scadden v. State, 732 P.2d 1036,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1987).

Denial of access to a tape recorded statement did not violate
rights. —

In a juvenile proceeding, defendant's constitutional rights were not violated as a result of the court denying him access to the alleged victim's tape-recorded statement where the record evidenced that defendant failed to show any of the required elements for advancing a Brady claim where initially defendant was unable to establish that the investigatory tape was lost or destroyed because of the calculated, bad faith effort of authorities with the intent to deny him the tape. All that was established was that the detective was unable to locate the investigatory tape for production and defendant was unable to establish that the evidence was constitutionally material and that its exculpatory value was apparent to authorities prior to its loss or destruction. KC v. State, 2004 WY 74, 92 P.3d 805,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2004).

Introduction of certain evidence did not deny confrontation
with witnesses. —

The introduction in evidence of duly certified copies of prison records, of judgments of conviction of previously committed felonies as alleged and of fingerprint records of defendant duly certified though taken in other states did not deprive defendant of the constitutional guaranty of confronting the witnesses against him.
Waxler v. State, 67 Wyo. 396, 224 P.2d 514,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1950).

The admission into evidence of court files and records on the issue of the defendant's habitual criminal status did not violate his constitutional right to confront witnesses against him. Amin v. State, 695 P.2d 1021,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1985).

Inadmissibility of victim impact statements in death penalty
cases. —

Neither the Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-102

death penalty statute nor Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

7-21-101

through

7-21-103

general victim impact statutes authorize the introduction of victim impact evidence during capital sentencing, and the trial court errs in allowing its introduction; such error, however, is subject to harmless error analysis. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Defendant's right to present a defense not violated. —

In an indecent liberties case, defendant's constitutional right to present a defense was not denied by the court's refusal to admit the testimony of a witness regarding an assessment of the relationship between the victim's father and the victim so that the factfinder might infer that the victim had a motive to lie. The purported testimony was not relevant, or was at most conditionally relevant, and the necessary preconditions were not met. Person v. State, 2004 WY 149, 100 P.3d 1270,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2004).

When defense counsel's inquiry into defendant's “nonstatements,” in an effort to prove an intoxication defense, was improperly barred on hearsay grounds, defendant's right to present a complete defense was not violated because ample other evidence of defendant's intoxication was presented. Toth v. State, 2015 WY 86, 2015 WY 86A, 353 P.3d 696,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2015).

Excluding defendant's expert testimony on the ability of a 15-year-old to form the specific intent to commit a crime did not violate defendant's right to present a defense because the testimony was not relevant, as (1) the expert would not have testified that 15-year-olds had no ability to form such an intent, as the testimony merely suggested that 15-year-olds were more impulsive than adults and had a reduced ability to evaluate consequences, (2) to the extent the testimony could be viewed as evidence of diminished capacity, it was not appropriate to expand defense of mental incapacity beyond the scope of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-11-302

, and, (3) the defense of infancy was supplanted by the legislature's allocation of jurisdiction between juvenile and criminal courts. Sen v. State, 2013 WY 47, 301 P.3d 106,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2013).

Defendant's prior convictions elicited by defense counsel.
—

The trial court's erroneous ruling that defense counsel could not elicit the fact of the defendant's prior convictions upon direct examination was an error of constitutional magnitude, but was nonetheless harmless error under the totality of all the evidence. Gentry v. State, 806 P.2d 1269,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1991).

Extent and manner of cross-examination vested within court's
discretion. —

While the denial of the right of cross-examination clearly would be error, the extent and manner of cross-examination are matters which are vested within the discretion of the trial court, and its ruling on such evidence will not be overturned in the absence of a clear abuse of discretion. Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982), overruled in part, Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003).

Repeating questions asked on direct examination may be restricted.
—

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in restricting defense counsel, in his cross-examination of a witness, from repeating questions asked on direct examination. Amin v. State, 695 P.2d 1021,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1985).

Constitutional standards for admissibility of prior testimony.
—

In the constitutional context, the following standards must be met in order for prior testimony to be admissible: (1) the prosecution must demonstrate that good faith efforts to obtain the presence of the missing witness for trial have been unavailing; and (2) the witness must have been subject to adequate cross-examination at the previous hearing or trial. Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982), overruled in part, Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003).

Former testimony is admissible under the confrontation clauses of both the constitutions of the United States and Wyoming if the witness who gave the former testimony is unavailable to testify at trial and if the prior testimony bore an “indicia of reliability” sufficient to afford the trier of fact a satisfactory basis for evaluating the truth of the prior statement. Prior testimony bears an adequate indicia of reliability when the prior testimony was given under oath, when it was given while the defendant was represented by counsel, when the defendant's counsel could and did cross-examine the witness, and when cross-examination which would be conducted at trial would not touch upon any new and significantly material line of inquiry. Impeachment of the witness, who identified the defendant at the preliminary hearing, is not a new line of inquiry. Rodriguez v. State, 711 P.2d 410,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 624

(Wyo. 1985).

Confrontation ensures reliability. —

Where testimonial statements are at issue, the only indicium of reliability sufficient to satisfy constitutional demands is the one the United States Constitution actually prescribes: confrontation, pursuant to Crawford v. Washington, 541 U.S. 36, 124 S. Ct. 1354, 158 L. Ed. 2d 177, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1838 (2004). To the extent prior cases of the Wyoming Supreme Court have followed the test enunciated by Ohio v. Roberts, 448 U.S. 56, 100 S. Ct. 2531, 65 L. Ed. 2d 597, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 140 (1980) to determine admissibility under the Confrontation Clause, those cases are overruled: Robinson v. State, 11 P.3d 361,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 2000); Johnson v. State, 930 P.2d 358,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1996); Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982).Vigil v. State, 2004 WY 110, 98 P.3d 172,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2004).

Requirements of section before hearsay admissible. —

Before hearsay becomes admissible, this section and U.S. Const., amend. 6 impose a burden upon the state, in addition to those found under Rule 804(b)(6), W.R.E., such that the prosecutor is required to establish: (1) that the declarant is unavailable to appear at trial; and (2) that there exists sufficient background information concerning the circumstances under which the hearsay statement was made to provide the jury with an adequate basis to evaluate its veracity. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

Confrontation clause satisfied where hearsay has sufficient
reliability. —

Rule 803(4), W.R.E., represents a firmly rooted exception to the hearsay rule, and, therefore, admission of evidence pursuant to that rule does not violate the confrontation clause. Blake v. State, 933 P.2d 474,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1997).

A statement made in the course of procuring medical services, when the declarant presumably knows that a false statement may cause misdiagnosis or mistreatment, carries special guarantees of credibility that a trier of fact may not think can be replicated by testimony in the context of the courtroom; where the proffered hearsay has those sufficient guarantees of reliability to bring it within a firmly-rooted exception to the hearsay rule, the confrontation clause of the Constitution is satisfied. Betzle v. State, 847 P.2d 1010,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1993).

In absence of objection, erroneous admission of hearsay must rise to plain error

before it will be considered by the appellate court. Schmunk v. State, 714 P.2d 724,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1986).

When failure to produce informant not deprivation of right
of confrontation. —

The state's failure to subpoena and produce an informant at a defendant's trial does not deprive him of his right to confront the witnesses against him, pursuant to U.S. Const., amend. 6, and art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const., where the defendant is furnished with the name and address of the informant well in advance of trial, he does not apply ex parte, under Rule 20, W.R.Cr.P. (now Rule 17), for a subpoena to be issued at state expense, and he makes no other effort to secure the informer's attendance at trial. Montez v. State, 670 P.2d 694,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1983).

Confrontation right not violated by circumstantial evidence.
—

Admission of papers found in defendant's dresser drawers did not violate his right to confrontation where they were offered as nonhearsay circumstantial evidence of defendant's past trafficking activities in controlled substances and of his knowledge regarding the illicit contents of a package. Saldana v. State, 846 P.2d 604,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. Feb. 24, 1993).

Defendant's confrontation rights weren't violated by the poor picture quality of electronic testimony

of a prosecution witness. Ryan v. State, 988 P.2d 46,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1999).

Confrontation clause violated by reading statement into the
record. —

In an aggravated assault case, the Confrontation Clause was violated where a police officer was allowed to read a co-defendant's statement into evidence after the co-defendant invoked the Fifth Amendment on the stand since defendant had no opportunity to cross-examine, and the error was not harmless because the statement was the only real evidence corroborating a victim's statement. Vigil v. State, 2004 WY 110, 98 P.3d 172,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2004).

Confrontation clause violated by admitting hearsay statement.
—
